Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2262.04
Intensive supervision probation programs; contents; supervision required; electronic device or system; cost.

Selected offenders in intensive supervision probation programs shall receive the highest level of supervision that is provided to probationers. Such programs may include, but shall not be limited to, highly restricted activities, daily contact between the offender and the probation officer, monitored curfew, home visitation, employment visitation and monitoring, drug and alcohol screening, treatment referrals and monitoring, and restitution and community service. Selected offenders monitored by an electronic device or system shall be required to pay the cost of such a device or system if the offender has the financial ability. It is the intent of the Legislature that such programs shall minimize any risk to the public.

Laws 1990, LB 220, § 2.